Arkansas, session 2025, HB1878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-418(b)(1)(A), concerning early voting,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A)(i) The county board of election commissioners shall hold
early voting for each preferential primary election and each general election
at a polling site in each city:
(a) Having a population of more than fifteen
thousand (15,000) people in the most recent federal decennial census; and
(b) Where the county clerk is not conducting
early voting.
(ii) The county board of election commissioners may
decide to hold early voting at additional polling sites outside the offices
*SSS252*
03/20/2025 1:37:21 PM SSS252

HB1878
of the county clerk on any of the days provided for in subsection (a) of this
section, if it so chooses.


































03/20/2025 1:37:21 PM SSS252